Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3894
(UTC 1005) Limitation of action against trustee.

(UTC 1005) (a) A beneficiary may not commence a proceeding against a trustee for breach of trust more than one year after the date the beneficiary or a representative of the beneficiary was sent a report that adequately disclosed the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust and informed the beneficiary of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

(b) A report adequately discloses the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary or representative knows of the potential claim or should have inquired into its existence.

(c) If subsection (a) of this section does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a beneficiary against a trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within four years after the first to occur of:

(1) the removal, resignation, or death of the trustee;

(2) the termination of the beneficiary's interest in the trust; or

(3) the termination of the trust.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 94.

The court viewed this section as recognition of the general rule that a cause of action for breach of trust, including a request for accounting, does not accrue until termination of the trust, with an exception if a potential claim for breach of trust is disclosed to the beneficiary. In re Charles C. Wells Revocable Trust, 15 Neb. App. 624, 734 N.W.2d 323 (2007).